ro-RO: Detaliu de pasmanterie: Ornamente cu mărgele; Ornamente croșetate; Ornamente brodate; Ornamente cu franjuri; Ornamente din dantelă; Dungă metalică; Ornamente cu pompoane; Margine nefinisată; Ornamente cu volane; Margine festonată; Ornamente cu canafuri; Altele
vi: Chi tiết trang trí: Viền đính hạt; Viền móc len; Viền thêu; Viền tua rua thưa; Viền ren; Sọc ánh kim; Viền quả bông; Viền thô; Viền bèo nhún; Viền vỏ sò; Viền tua rua; Khác
da: Trimdetaljer: Perlekant; Hæklet kant; Broderet kant; Frynsekant; Blondekant; Metallisk stribe; Pomponkant; Rå kant; Flæsekant; Bølgekant; Kvastkant; Andet
nb: Triminformasjon: Perlekant; Heklet kant; Brodert kant; Frynsekant; Blondekant; Metallisk stripe; Duskekant; Rå kant; Rysjekant; Bølgekant; Duskekant; Annet
de: Besatzdetails: Perlenbesatz; Häkelbesatz; Bestickter Besatz; Fransenbesatz; Spitzenbesatz; Metallic-Streifen; Bommelborte; Offene Kante; Rüschenbesatz; Bogenkante; Quastenbesatz; Sonstiges
nl: Trim detail: Kralenafwerking; Gehaakte afwerking; Geborduurde afwerking; Franje-afwerking; Kant; Metallic streep; Pomponafwerking; Onbewerkte rand; Ruche-afwerking; Geschulpte rand; Kwastjesafwerking; Anders
ko: 트림 세부 장식: 비즈 장식 트림; 크로셰 트림; 자수 트림; 프린지 트림; 레이스 트림; 메탈릭 스트라이프; 폼폼 트림; 로 엣지; 러플 트림; 스캘럽 엣지; 태슬 트림; 기타
fi: Reunuksen tiedot: Helmikoristelu; Virkattu koristelu; Kirjailtu koristelu; Hapsukoristelu; Pitsireunus; Metalliraita; Tupsureunus; Raakareuna; Röyhelöreunus; Piparkakkureuna; Hapsureunus; Muu
sv: Kantdetalj: Pärlband; Virkad kantband; Broderat kantband; Fransband; Spetskant; Metallrand; Bollfrans; Rå kant; Volangkant; Vågig kant; Tofskant; Annat
fr: Détail du galon: Garniture perlée; Garniture au crochet; Garniture brodée; Garniture à franges; Bordure en dentelle; Bande métallique; Bordure à pompons; Bord franc; Bordure à volants; Bord festonné; Bordure à franges; Autre
sk-SK: Detail lemu: Korálkový lem; Háčkovaný lem; Vyšívaný lem; Strapcový lem; Čipkovaný lem; Kovový pruh; Brmbolcový lem; Neopracovaný okraj; Volánový lem; Vlnovkový okraj; Lem so strapcami; Iné
bg-BG: Детайл на декоративния кант: Кант с мъниста; Плетен кант; Бродиран кант; Кант с ресни; Дантелен кант; Метална лента; Кант с помпони; Необработен ръб; Кант с къдрици; Вълнообразен ръб; Кант с пискюли; Друго
sl-SI: Detajl obrobe: Obroba s kroglicami; Kvačkana obroba; Vezena obroba; Obroba z resicami; Čipkasta obroba; Kovinska črta; Obroba s cofi; Surov rob; Nagubana obroba; Valovit rob; Obroba s čopki; Drugo
th: รายละเอียดการตกแต่ง: ขอบประดับลูกปัด; ขอบถักโครเชต์; ขอบปักลาย; ขอบแต่งพู่; ขอบลูกไม้; แถบสีเมทัลลิก; ขอบปอมปอม; ขอบตัด; ขอบระบาย; ขอบหยัก; ขอบแต่งพู่; อื่นๆ
pl: Detal wykończenia: Z koralikami; Szydełkowe; Haftowane; Z frędzlami; Wykończenie koronkowe; Metaliczny pasek; Wykończenie z pomponami; Niewykończony brzeg; Wykończenie z falbanką; Muszelkowy brzeg; Wykończenie z frędzlami; Inne
zh-CN: 饰边细节: 串珠饰边; 钩针饰边; 刺绣饰边; 流苏饰边; 蕾丝饰边; 金属色条纹; 绒球饰边; 毛边; 褶边饰边; 扇形边; 流苏饰边; 其他
cs: Ozdobné prvky: Lemování s korálky; Háčkované lemování; Vyšívané lemování; Třásňové lemování; Krajkové lemování; Metalický pruh; Lemování s bambulkami; Nezačištěný okraj; Volánové lemování; Obloučkový okraj; Střapcové lemování; Ostatní
ru: Детали отделки: Отделка бисером; Вязаная отделка; Вышитая отделка; Отделка бахромой; Кружевная отделка; Металлизированная полоска; Отделка помпонами; Необработанный край; Отделка оборками; Фестонный край; Отделка кисточками; Другое
pt-PT: Detalhes do acabamento: Guarnição com missangas; Guarnição em croché; Guarnição bordada; Guarnição com franjas; Remate em renda; Risca metálica; Remate com pompons; Corte a fio; Remate com folho; Rebordo recortado; Remate com borlas; Outro
hr-HR: Informacije o ukrasu: Obrub s perlama; Heklani obrub; Vezeni obrub; Obrub s resicama; Čipkasti obrub; Metalik pruga; Obrub s pomponima; Neobrađeni rub; Nabrani obrub; Valoviti rub; Obrub s kićankama; Ostalo
ja: トリム詳細: ビーズトリム; クロシェトリム; 刺繍トリム; フリンジトリム; レーストリム; メタリックストライプ; ポンポントリム; ローエッジ; ラッフルトリム; スカラップエッジ; タッセルトリム; その他
es: Detalle del ribete: Ribete con cuentas; Ribete de ganchillo; Ribete bordado; Ribete con flecos; Ribete de encaje; Raya metálica; Ribete de pompones; Borde sin rematar; Ribete con volantes; Borde festoneado; Ribete de borlas; Otro
pt-BR: Aviamento detalhe: Acabamento com miçangas; Acabamento em crochê; Acabamento bordado; Acabamento com franja; Acabamento em renda; Listra metálica; Acabamento em pompom; Borda sem acabamento; Acabamento com babado; Borda escalopada; Acabamento em tassel; Outro
el: Λεπτομέρειες τρέσας: Τρέσα με χάντρες; Πλεκτή τρέσα (κροσέ); Κεντητή τρέσα; Τρέσα με κρόσσια; Δαντελένιο ρέλι; Μεταλλιζέ ρίγα; Τελείωμα με πον πον; Ακατέργαστο τελείωμα; Τελείωμα με βολάν; Κυματιστό τελείωμα; Τελείωμα με κρόσσια; Άλλο
it: Dettaglio del bordo decorativo: Passamaneria con perline; Passamaneria all'uncinetto; Passamaneria ricamata; Passamaneria con frange; Finitura in pizzo; Striscia metallizzata; Finitura con pompon; Bordo a taglio vivo; Finitura con volant; Bordo smerlato; Finitura con nappe; Altro
hu: Díszítéssel kapcsolatos részletek: Gyöngyös szegély; Horgolt szegély; Hímzett szegély; Rojtos szegély; Csipkeszegély; Fémes csík; Bojtos szegély; Vágott szél; Fodros szegély; Cakkos szegély; Rojtos szegély; Egyéb
lt-LT: Apipjaustymo informacija / duomenys: Apdaila su karoliukais; Nerta apdaila; Siuvinėta apdaila; Apdaila su kutais; Nėrinių apdaila; Metalizuota juostelė; Bumbulų apdaila; Neapdirbtas kraštas; Raukinių apdaila; Banguotas kraštas; Apdaila su kuteliais; Kita
tr: Süsleme detayı: Boncuklu süsleme; Tığ işi süsleme; İşlemeli süsleme; Püsküllü süsleme; Dantel süsleme; Metalik şerit; Ponponlu süsleme; Ham kenar; Fırfırlı süsleme; Dilimli kenar; Püsküllü süsleme; Diğer
en: Trim detail: Beaded trim; Crochet trim; Embroidered trim; Fringe trim; Lace trim; Metallic stripe; Pom-pom trim; Raw edge; Ruffle trim; Scallop edge; Tassel trim; Other
zh-TW: 飾邊細節: 串珠飾邊; 鉤針飾邊; 刺繡飾邊; 流蘇飾邊; 蕾絲飾邊; 金屬感條紋; 毛球飾邊; 毛邊; 荷葉邊; 扇形邊; 流蘇飾邊; 其他